Illinois, session 104th, HB4165.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 1-110 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/1-110 new)7    Sec. 1-110. Application of Shari'a and other foreign law.8    (a) This Section may be referred to as the No Shari'a Act.9    (b) The General Assembly finds that the right to freely 10contract under State law must be circumscribed if the 11application of foreign law would violate the fundamental 12liberties, rights, and privileges guaranteed by the United 13States Constitution and the Illinois Constitution, including, 14but not limited to, equal protection, due process of law, free 15exercise of religion, freedom of speech and the press, the 16right of privacy, and the right of marriage.17    (c) As used in this Section, "foreign law, legal code, or 18system" means any law, legal code, or system of a jurisdiction 19outside of any state or territory of the United States, 20including international organizations and tribunals.21    (d) Each of the following is void and unenforceable if it 22allows the application of Shari'a or any foreign law, legal 23code, or system that denies the parties the fundamental   HB4165- 2 -LRB104 15825 JRC 29031 b1liberties, rights, and privileges guaranteed under the United 2States Constitution or the Illinois Constitution:3        (1) A ruling or decision of a state court, arbitration 4    panel, tribunal, or administrative agency that is based, 5    in whole or in part, on Shari'a or any foreign law, legal 6    code, or system;7        (2) A contract, or contractual provision if severable, 8    that provides for the choice of Shari'a or any foreign 9    law, legal code, or system; or10        (3) A contract, or contractual provision if severable, 11    that grants jurisdiction to a foreign tribunal12    (e) This Section does not:13        (1) disapprove or abrogate existing precedent of the 14    Illinois Supreme Court;15        (2) limit adjudication of ecclesiastical matters of a 16    religious organization, including the selection, 17    appointment, discipline, or removal of clergy or 18    interpretation of doctrine;19        (3) apply to corporations, partnerships, or 20    associations that voluntarily subject themselves to 21    foreign law or courts; or22        (4) apply where federal law preempts State law, 23    including obligations under treaties or international 24    agreements.25    (f) A State court, arbitration panel, tribunal, or 26administrative agency may not transfer any civil action under   HB4165- 3 -LRB104 15825 JRC 29031 b1this Code if the transfer would result in the application of 2Shari'a or any foreign law, legal code, or system that would 3violate or likely violate the fundamental liberties, rights, 4and privileges of the parties guaranteed under the United 5States Constitution or the Illinois Constitution.